Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.171

Designating John McCoy (lulilaš) since time immemorial curriculum.

(1) The legislature recognizes the tireless and visionary efforts of John McCoy to support student and educator learning about the history, culture, and government of federally recognized Indian tribes in the Pacific Northwest.

(2) In 2005, John McCoy, whose traditional name in Lushootseed is lulilaš, sponsored Substitute House Bill No. 1495. The enacted legislation began the statewide process of incorporating information about tribal history, culture, and government into social studies courses in which Washington or United States history is taught. The resulting instructional materials have become known as the since time immemorial curriculum.

(3) The legislature, therefore, intends to honor the efforts of John McCoy by naming the curriculum used to support his vision as the John McCoy (lulilaš) since time immemorial curriculum.

[ 2024 c 200 s 1.]